Utah statutes.
57-24-102.   Restriction on prohibition of display of flag.

(1)  A residential property management authority may not prohibit a resident from displaying a flag:

(a)  consistent with the guidelines in United States Code Title 4, Chapter 1, The Flag;

(b)  within an area over which the resident has exclusive control; and

(c)  from a staff, pole, or window.

(2)  In any action to enforce this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded costs and reasonable attorney fees.

(3)  This section does not apply to a contract or agreement entered into before May 3, 2004.



Enacted by Chapter 44, 2004 General Session

